Tennessee, session 114, SB0582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-104(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) The department shall establish an initial enrollment deadline that an LEA
must use to determine if a voluntary pre-kindergarten classroom provided by the LEA
has space available to enroll students in addition to at-risk children residing in the
geographic area served by the LEA. The initial enrollment deadline established
pursuant to this subdivision (c)(1)(A) must not be later than the start of the school year.
(B) The department shall establish an enrollment deadline that an LEA must use
for the enrollment of students who are eligible to enroll in a voluntary pre-kindergarten
classroom pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) if a voluntary pre-kindergarten classroom
provided by the LEA has space available to enroll students after the initial enrollment
deadline. The enrollment deadline established pursuant to this subdivision (c)(1)(B)
must not be later than August 30.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
SB0582
002304
- 1 -